Maine, session 132, LD753.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 4 MRSA §1610-I, as amended by PL 2023, c. 17, Pt. O, §1, is further
amended to read:
§1610-I. Additional securities; judicial branch
Notwithstanding any limitation on the amount of securities that may be issued pursuant
to section 1606, subsection 2, the authority may issue additional securities from time to
time in an aggregate amount not to exceed $95,600,000 outstanding at any one time for the
purposes of paying the costs associated with the planning, purchasing, financing, acquiring,
constructing, renovating, furnishing, equipping, improving, extending, enlarging and
consolidating new and existing facilities and projects relating to the judicial branch in the
counties of Oxford, Waldo, Penobscot and York, acquiring and improving property relating
to the judicial branch in Hancock County and 55 Lisbon Street in Lewiston, replacing and
upgrading ventilation systems in facilities relating to the judicial branch in Presque Isle,
Lewiston, Rockland, Skowhegan and West Bath, acquiring and improving property
adjacent to the Capital Judicial Center in Augusta for parking and acquiring and improving
property in Skowhegan for future expansion and planning for other court facilities.
Page 1 - 132LR1118(03)